Vermont, session 2025-2026, S65.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 209 is amended to read:
§ 209. JURISDICTION; GENERAL SCOPE
* * *
(d) Energy efficiency and emissions reduction.
(1) Programs and measures. The Department of Public Service, any
entity appointed by the Commission under subdivision (2) of this subsection,
all gas and electric utility companies, and the Commission upon its own
motion are encouraged to propose, develop, solicit, and monitor energy
efficiency and conservation programs and measures, including electrification,
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 2 of 18
energy storage, and appropriate combined heat and power systems that result
in the conservation and efficient use of energy. and Any programs and
measures supporting efficient use of biological and fossil-based fuels shall
meet the applicable air quality standards of the Agency of Natural Resources.
Such programs and measures, and their implementation, may be approved by
the Commission if it determines they will be beneficial to towards the
reduction of greenhouse gas emissions required under 10 V.S.A. § 578 and
beneficial to consumers or the ratepayers of the companies after such notice
and hearings as the Commission may require by order or by rule. The
Department of Public Service shall investigate the feasibility of enhancing and
expanding the efficiency programs of gas utilities and shall make any
appropriate proposals to the Commission.
(2) Appointment of independent efficiency entities.
(A) Electricity and natural gas. In place of utility-specific programs
developed pursuant to this section and section 218c of this title, the
Commission shall, after notice and opportunity for hearing, provide for the
development, implementation, and monitoring of gas and electric energy
efficiency, and conservation, electrification, active demand management, and
energy storage programs and measures, including programs and measures
delivered in multiple service territories, by one or more entities appointed by
the Commission for these purposes. The Commission may include appropriate
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 3 of 18
combined heat and power systems that result in the conservation and efficient
use of energy and meet the applicable air quality standards of the Agency of
Natural Resources. Except with regard to a transmission company, the
Commission may specify that the appointment of an energy efficiency utility to
deliver services within an electric utility’s service territory satisfies that
electric utility’s corresponding obligations, in whole or in part, under section
218c of this title and under any prior orders of the Commission.
(B) Thermal energy and process-fuel customers. The Commission
shall provide for the coordinated development, implementation, and
monitoring of cost-effective efficiency and conservation programs to thermal
energy and process-fuel customers on a whole buildings basis by one or more
entities appointed by the Commission for this purpose.
(i) In this section, “thermal energy” means the use of fuels to
control the temperature of space within buildings and to heat water. In this
section, “process fuel” means fuel used in commercial and industrial
production operations.
(ii) Periodically on a schedule directed by the Commission, the
appointed entity or entities shall propose to the Commission a plan to
implement this subdivision (d)(2)(B). The proposed plan shall comply with
subsections (e)–(g) of this section and shall be subject to the Commission’s
approval. The Commission shall not conduct the review of the proposed plan
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 4 of 18
as a contested case under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 but shall provide notice and an
opportunity for written and oral comments to the public and affected parties
and State agencies.
(C) The appointed entity may be used to support the attainment of
building energy codes established pursuant to sections 51 and 53 of this title.
The Commission shall review and approve a methodology for the appointed
entities to support the attainment of code in the next Demand Resources Plan
Proceeding. The Commission is authorized to approve a methodology for the
appointed entity and the State to quantify energy savings achieved through
code attainment, which shall be counted toward the appointed entity’s
quantitative savings targets.
(D) The appointed entity shall receive a total annual budget from 2027
through 2030 that is equivalent to the inflation-adjusted Commission-approved
budget in 2026.
(3) Energy efficiency charge; regulated fuels. In addition to its existing
authority, the Commission may establish by order or rule a volumetric charge
to customers for the support of energy efficiency programs that meet the
requirements of section 218c of this title, with priority consideration given to
the greenhouse gas reduction requirements under 10 V.S.A. § 578, and due
consideration to the State’s energy policy under section 202a of this title and to
its energy and economic policy interests under section 218e of this title to
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 5 of 18
maintain and enhance the State’s economic vitality. The charge shall be
known as the energy efficiency charge, shall be shown separately on each
customer’s bill, and shall be paid to a fund administrator appointed by the
Commission and deposited into the Electric Efficiency Fund. When such a
charge is shown, notice as to how to obtain information about energy
efficiency programs approved under this section shall be provided in a manner
directed by the Commission. This notice shall include, at a minimum, a toll-
free telephone number, and to the extent feasible shall be on the customer’s bill
and near the energy efficiency charge.
(4) Supplemental funding; Programs funded under this section shall also
be funded without further appropriation or offsets by each of the following:
(A) Net revenues above costs associated with payments from the
New England Independent System Operator (ISO-NE) for capacity savings
resulting from the activities of the energy efficiency utility designated under
subdivision (2)(A) of this subsection (e) that are not transferred to the State
PACE Reserve Fund under 24 V.S.A. § 3270(c). These revenues shall be
deposited into the Efficiency Fund established by this section.
(B) Net revenues above costs from the sale of carbon credits under
the cap and trade program established under section 255 of this title, which
shall be deposited into the Efficiency Fund established by this section.
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 6 of 18
(C) Any other monies that are appropriated to or deposited in the
Electric Efficiency Fund for the delivery of thermal energy and process fuel
energy efficiency services.
(D) Notwithstanding subsection (e) of this section, a retail electricity
provider that is also an entity appointed under subdivision (d)(2)(A), may use
monies subject to subsection (e) of this section and any of the Supplemental
Funding outlined in this subdivision (4) to deliver thermal and transportation
measures or programs that reduce fossil fuel use regardless of the preexisting
fuel source of the customer with special emphasis on measures or programs
that take a new or innovative approach to reducing fossil fuel use including
support for staffing necessary to implement innovative building sector policies
and modifying or supplementing existing vehicle incentive programs and
electric vehicle supply equipment grant programs to incentivize high-
consumption fuel users, especially individuals using more than 1000 gallons of
gasoline or diesel annually and those with low and moderate income, to
transition to the use of battery electric vehicles. The amounts available shall
include amounts annually budgeted for thermal energy and process fuel funds
or from Supplemental Funding, and any carry-forward thermal energy and
process fuel funds or Supplemental Funding from prior periods, on programs,
measures, and services that reduce greenhouse gas emissions in the thermal
energy or transportation sector.
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 7 of 18
(A)(5) Regulated use of the Efficiency Fund. Balances in the Electric
Efficiency Fund shall be ratepayer funds, shall be used to support the activities
authorized in this subdivision in a fuel neutral manner, and shall be carried
forward and remain in the Fund at the end of each fiscal year. These monies
shall not be available to meet the general obligations of the State. Interest
earned shall remain in the Fund. The Commission will annually provide the
General Assembly with a report detailing the revenues collected and the
expenditures made for energy efficiency programs under this section. The
provisions of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d) (expiration of required reports) shall not apply
to the report to be made under this subsection (d).
(B)(A) The charge charges established by the Commission pursuant
to this subdivision (3)(5) shall be in an amount determined by the Commission
by rule or order that is consistent with the principles of least-cost integrated
planning as defined in section 218c of this title are societally cost-effective for
the purpose of reducing greenhouse gas emissions. As circumstances and
programs evolve, the amount of the charge charges shall be reviewed for
unrealized energy efficiency potential and shall be adjusted as necessary in
order to realize all reasonably available, cost-effective energy efficiency
savings. In setting the amount of the charge and its allocation, the Commission
shall determine an appropriate balance among the following objectives;
provided, however, that particular emphasis shall be accorded to the first four
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 8 of 18
of these objectives: prioritize the reduction of greenhouse gases and seek to
balance the other following objectives: reducing Vermont’s total energy
demand, consumption, and expenditures; reducing the size of future power
purchases; reducing the generation of greenhouse gases equitable distribution
of benefits using geographic and economic indicators; limiting the need to
upgrade the State’s transmission and distribution infrastructure; minimizing the
costs of electricity; reducing Vermont’s total energy demand, consumption,
and expenditures; providing efficiency and conservation as a part of a
comprehensive resource supply strategy that includes implementation of
beneficial electrification and energy storage system projects; providing the
opportunity for all Vermonters to participate in efficiency and conservation
programs; and targeting efficiency and conservation efforts to locations,
markets, or customers where they may provide the greatest value.
(C)(B) The Commission, by rule or order, shall establish a process by
which a customer who pays an average annual energy efficiency charge under
this subdivision (3)(5) of at least $5,000.00 may apply to the Commission to
self-administer energy efficiency through an energy savings account or
customer credit program that shall contain up to 75 percent and 90 percent,
respectively of the customer’s energy efficiency charge payments as
determined by the Commission. The remaining portion of the charge shall be
used for administrative, measurement, verification, and evaluation costs and
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 9 of 18
for systemwide energy benefits. Customer energy efficiency funds may be
approved for use by the Commission for one or more of the following: electric
energy efficiency projects and non-electric nonelectric efficiency projects,
which may include thermal and process fuel efficiency, flexible load
management, combined heat and power systems, demand management, energy
productivity, and energy storage. These funds shall not be used for the
purchase or installation of new equipment capable of combusting fossil fuels.
The Commission in its rules or order shall establish criteria for each program
and approval of these applications, establish application and enrollment
periods, establish participant requirements, and establish the methodology for
evaluation, measurement, and verification for programs. The total amount of
customer energy efficiency funds that can be placed into energy savings
accounts or the customer credit program annually is $2,000,000.00 and
$1,000,000.00 respectively.
(D) The Commission may authorize the use of funds raised through
an energy efficiency charge on electric ratepayers to reduce the use of fossil
fuels for space heating by supporting electric technologies that may increase
electric consumption, such as air source or geothermal heat pumps if, after
investigation, it finds that deployment of the technology:
(i) will be beneficial to electric ratepayers as a whole;
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 10 of 18
(ii) will result in cost-effective energy savings to the end-user and
to the State as a whole;
(iii) will result in a net reduction in State energy consumption and
greenhouse gas emissions on a life-cycle basis and will not have a detrimental
impact on the environment through other means such as release of refrigerants
or disposal. In making a finding under this subdivision, the Commission shall
consider the use of the technology at all times of year and any likely new
electricity demand created by such use;
(iv) will be part of a comprehensive energy efficiency and
conservation program that meets the requirements of subsections (d)-(g) of this
section and that makes support for the technology contingent on the energy
performance of the building in which the technology is to be installed. The
building’s energy performance shall achieve or shall be improved to achieve an
energy performance level that is approved by the Commission and that is
consistent with meeting or exceeding the goals of 10 V.S.A. § 581 (building
efficiency);
(v) among the product models of the technology that are suitable
for use in Vermont, will employ the product models that are the most efficient
available;
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 11 of 18
(vi) will be promoted in conjunction with demand management
strategies offered by the customer’s distribution utility to address any increase
in peak electric consumption that may be caused by the deployment;
(vii) will be coordinated between the energy efficiency and
distribution utilities, consistent with subdivision (f)(5) of this section; and
(viii) will be supported by an appropriate allocation of funds
among the funding sources described in this subsection (d) and subsection (e)
of this section. In the case of measures used to increase the energy
performance of a building in which the technology is to be installed, the
Commission shall assume installation of the technology in the building and
then determine the allocation according to the proportion of the benefits
provided to the regulated fuel and unregulated fuel sectors. In this subdivision
(viii), “regulated fuel” and “unregulated fuel” shall have the same meaning as
under subsection (e) of this section.
(4)(6) Contract or order of appointment. Appointment of an entity
under subdivision (2) of this subsection may be by contract or by an order of
appointment. An appointment, whether by order of appointment or by
contract, may only be issued after notice and opportunity for hearing. An order
of appointment shall be for a limited duration not to exceed 12 years, although
an entity may be reappointed by order or contract. An order of appointment
may include any conditions and requirements that the Commission deems
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 12 of 18
appropriate to promote the public good. For good cause, after notice and
opportunity for hearing, the Commission may amend or revoke an order of
appointment.
(5)(7) Appointed entity; supervision. Any entity appointed by order of
appointment under subdivisions (2) and (4)(6) of this subsection that is not an
electric or gas utility already regulated under this title shall not be considered
to be a company as defined under section 201 of this title but shall be subject
to the provisions of sections 18–21, 30–32, 205–208, subsection 209(a),
sections 219, 221, and subsection 231(b) of this title, to the same extent as a
company as defined under section 201 of this title. The Commission and the
Department of Public Service shall have jurisdiction under those sections over
the entity, its directors, receivers, trustees, lessees, or other persons or
companies owning or operating the entity and of all plants, equipment, and
property of that entity used in or about the business carried on by it in this
State as covered and included in this section. This jurisdiction shall be
exercised by the Commission and the Department so far as may be necessary
to enable them to perform the duties and exercise the powers conferred upon
them by law. The Commission and the Department each may, when they deem
the public good requires, examine the plants, equipment, and property of any
entity appointed by order of appointment under subdivisions (2) and (4) of this
subsection.
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 13 of 18
(8) Provision of equity and justice in services; requirements. Any
appointed entity shall ensure an equitable and just provision of services.
(A) Not less than 25 percent of the annual budget shall be targeted
for residential services for customers with low to moderate income.
(B) Not less than 12.5 percent of the annual budget shall be targeted
for small businesses and not-for-profit organizations.
(C) The cost of providing services under this subsection (6) shall be
excluded from the calculation of cost-effectiveness for the appointed entities’
portfolio of services.
(D) On or before September 1, 2026, the appointed entity shall
propose and the Commission shall evaluate the appropriateness of a statewide
low-income energy efficiency rate for regulated fuels. The Commission may
consider the technical feasibility of implementation before approving such a
rate. For a distribution utility that is also an appointed entity, and has a
Commission approved discounted low-income rate, that appointed entity may
elect to apply its Commission approved discounted low-income rate criteria to
the energy efficiency charge in lieu of adopting a statewide low-income energy
efficiency rate.
(e) Thermal energy and process fuel efficiency funding.
(1) Each of the following shall be used to deliver thermal energy and
process fuel energy efficiency services in accordance with this section for
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 14 of 18
unregulated fuels to Vermont consumers of such fuels. In addition, the
Commission may authorize an entity appointed to deliver such services under
subdivision (d)(2)(B) of this section to use monies subject to this subsection
for the engineering, design, and construction of facilities for the conversion of
thermal energy customers using fossil fuels to district heat if the majority of
the district’s energy is from biomass sources, the district’s distribution system
is highly energy efficient, and such conversion is cost effective.
(A) Net revenues above costs associated with payments from the New
England Independent System Operator (ISO-NE) for capacity savings resulting
from the activities of the energy efficiency utility designated under subdivision
(2)(A) of this subsection (e) that are not transferred to the State PACE Reserve
Fund under 24 V.S.A. § 3270(c). These revenues shall be deposited into the
Electric Efficiency Fund established by this section. In delivering services with
respect to heating systems using the revenues subject to this subdivision (A),
the entity shall give priority to incentives for the installation of high efficiency
biomass heating systems and shall have a goal of offering an incentive that is
equal to 25 percent of the installed cost of such a system. Provision of an
incentive under this subdivision (A) for a biomass heating system shall not be
contingent on the making of other energy efficiency improvements at the
property on which the system will be installed.
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 15 of 18
(B) Net revenues above costs from the sale of carbon credits under the
cap and trade program established under section 255 of this title, which shall
be deposited into the Electric Efficiency Fund established by this section.
(C) Any other monies that are appropriated to or deposited in the
Electric Efficiency Fund for the delivery of thermal energy and process fuel
energy efficiency services.
(2) If a program combines regulated fuel efficiency services with
unregulated fuel efficiency services supported by funds under this section, the
Commission shall allocate the costs of the program among the funding sources
for the regulated and unregulated fuel sectors in proportion to the benefits
provided to each sector.
(3) In this subsection:
(A) “Biomass” means organic nonfossil material constituting a
source of renewable energy within the meaning of section 8002 of this title.
(B) “District heat” means a system through which steam or hot water
from a central plant is piped into buildings to be used as a source of thermal
energy.
(C) “Efficiency services” includes the establishment of a statewide
information clearinghouse under subsection (g) of this section.
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 16 of 18
(D) “Fossil fuel” means an energy source formed in the earth’s crust
from decayed organic material. The common fossil fuels are petroleum, coal,
and natural gas. A fossil fuel may be a regulated or unregulated fuel.
(E) “Regulated fuels” means electricity and natural gas delivered by a
regulated utility.
(F) “Unregulated fuels” means fuels used by thermal energy and
process fuel customers other than electricity and natural gas delivered by a
regulated utility.
(f) Goals and criteria; all energy efficiency programs. With respect to all
energy efficiency programs approved under this section, the Commission shall:
(1) Ensure that all retail consumers, regardless of retail electricity, gas,
or heating or process fuel provider, will have an opportunity to participate in
and benefit from a comprehensive set of cost-effective energy efficiency,
electrification, and energy storage programs and initiatives designed to
overcome barriers to participation.
(2) Require that continued or improved efficiencies be made in the
production, delivery, and use of energy efficiency services, including the use
of compensation mechanisms for any energy efficiency entity appointed under
subdivision (d)(2) of this section that are based upon verified greenhouse gas
emission reductions, savings in energy usage and demand, and other
performance targets specified by the Commission. The linkage between
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 17 of 18
compensation and verified savings in energy usage and demand (and other
performance targets) shall be reviewed and adjusted not less than triennially by
the Commission.
* * *
(g) Thermal energy and process fuel efficiency programs; additional
criteria. With respect to energy efficiency programs delivered under this
section to thermal energy and process fuel customers, the Commission shall:
(1) Ensure that programs are delivered on a whole-buildings basis to
help meet the State’s building efficiency goals established by 10 V.S.A. § 581
and to reduce greenhouse gas emissions from thermal energy and process fuel
use in Vermont pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 578.
(2) Require the establishment of a statewide information clearinghouse
to enable effective access for customers to and effective coordination across
programs. The clearinghouse shall serve as a portal for customers to access
thermal energy and process fuel efficiency services and for coordination
among State, regional, and local entities involved in the planning or delivery of
such services, making referrals as appropriate to service providers and to
entities having information on associated environmental issues such as the
presence of asbestos in existing insulation.
VT LEG #380343 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.65
2025 Page 18 of 18
(3) In consultation with the Agency of Natural Resources, establish
annual interim goals starting in 2014 to meet the 2017 and 2020 goals for
improving the energy fitness of housing stock stated in 10 V.S.A. § 581(1).
(4) Ensure the monitoring of the State’s progress in meeting the goals of
10 V.S.A. § 581(1). This monitoring shall be performed according to a
standard methodology and on a periodic basis that is not less than annual.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380343 v.3